Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.330

Inclusion of American Indian peoples culture in state history and government courses—Instruction in American sign language or American Indian languages satisfies language requirement.

(1) Any course in Washington state history and government used to fulfill high school graduation requirements established by the state board of education shall consider including information on the culture, history, and government of the American Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.

(2) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other than English established by the state board of education or a local school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation, students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied the state or local school district graduation requirement for instruction in one or more languages other than English.

[ 2024 c 66 s 3.]